Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-520
Armory; bonds; issuance; election required; applicability of section.

The city council of a city of the metropolitan class may issue bonds for the purpose of constructing an armory in the city if the issuance of such bonds is first authorized by a majority of the electors of such city voting on such proposition. This section shall not be applicable to the acquisition of real estate for armory purposes and its conveyance to the State of Nebraska as provided in sections 18-1001 to 18-1006.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 16 1/2, p. 476;

C.S.1922, § 3641;

C.S.1929, § 14-518;

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 10, § 4, p. 73;

Laws 1941, c. 130, § 10, p. 495;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 14-518;

R.S.1943, § 14-520;

Laws 1971, LB 534, § 10;

Laws 1988, LB 793, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 171.
July 21, 2022